Wisconsin, session 2025, AB714.
do enact as follows:AB714,11Section 1. 633.01 (2w) of the statutes is created to read:AB714,2,52633.01 (2w) “High-cost claim” means a claim that is associated with an 3individual who is provided health care coverage by a plan sponsor and in which the 4aggregate for an episode of care exceeds, or is expected to exceed within a 12-month 5period, any of the following:AB714,2,66(a) For a claim that is not a pharmacy claim, $25,000.AB714,2,77(b) For a claim that is a pharmacy claim, $10,000.AB714,28Section 2. 633.01 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:AB714,2,119633.01 (3m) “Large group health benefit plan” means a group health benefit 10plan, as defined in s. 632.745 (9), if the group consists of at least 50 employees or 11includes at least 50 eligible employees, as defined in s. 632.745 (5).AB714,312Section 3. 633.01 (4m) of the statutes is created to read:AB714,2,1313633.01 (4m) “Plan sponsor” has the meaning given in s. 632.745 (22).AB714,41Section 4. 633.01 (4n) of the statutes is created to read:AB714,3,32633.01 (4n) “Plan sponsor’s designee” includes a business associate, as 3defined in 45 CFR 160.103.AB714,54Section 5. 633.04 (12) of the statutes is created to read:AB714,3,65633.04 (12) That the plan sponsor has ownership of and access to claims data 6as provided in s. 633.065.AB714,67Section 6. 633.065 of the statutes is created to read:AB714,3,158633.065 Plan sponsor ownership of and access to claims data. (1) 9Ownership of claims data. A contract between an administrator and a plan 10sponsor relating to health benefit coverage, between an insurer and a plan sponsor 11to provide coverage under a large group health benefit plan, or between a pharmacy 12benefit manager and a plan sponsor to administer or manage prescription drug 13benefits shall provide that the plan sponsor owns the claims data relating to the 14contract. Claims data may not be sold to any party without the permission of the 15plan sponsor and the individual to whom the claims data relates.AB714,3,1816(2) Duties of administrator and insurers. A contract under sub. (1) 17between a plan sponsor and an administrator or insurer shall require the 18administrator or insurer to do all of the following:AB714,3,2219(a) Provide the plan sponsor or plan sponsor’s designee, within 7 business 20days of a written request and in a form and manner that is acceptable to the plan 21sponsor or plan sponsor’s designee, the itemized billing statements and medical 22records associated with a high-cost claim prior to payment of the high-cost claim.AB714,4,323(b) Provide the plan sponsor or plan sponsor’s designee, within 7 business 24days of a written request and in a form and manner that is acceptable to the plan 1sponsor or plan sponsor’s designee, information on claims paid under the contract. 2The information shall include all of the following for the period specified by the plan 3sponsor or plan sponsor’s designee under sub. (4):AB714,4,441. Claims data showing all of the following: AB714,4,55a. The effective date of coverage.AB714,4,66b. The total number of covered individuals.AB714,4,77c. The total monthly earned premium.AB714,4,98d. The total monthly dollar value of paid claims, regardless of the period in 9which the claims were incurred.AB714,4,1210e. The beginning and ending date of the period for which claims were paid and 11the percentage of claims that were paid in less than 30 days, within 30 to 60 days, 12within 61 to 90 days, and after 90 days.AB714,4,1413f. The reserve value as of the beginning of the period and the reserve value as 14of the date through which the paid claims data was obtained.AB714,4,1815g. A description of each high-cost claim, including the diagnosis, prognosis, 16identifiable data about the individual to enable the identification of other insurance 17arrangements, dollar amount, status as open or closed, and total number of days in 18open status.AB714,4,21192. Claims, including electronic claims transactions, related to the contract 20that are received on any current standardized claim form approved by the federal 21government. AB714,5,2223. The claims payments, electronic funds transfers, and remittance advice 23notices related to the contract, including the paid premium and paid claims 24transactions over the same time period for professional and institutional services. 1The administrator or insurer shall provide the information under this subdivision 2as electronic files.AB714,5,634. Fees charged to the plan sponsor for plan administration, claims 4processing, and any other service. The information provided under this subdivision 5shall include all amounts retained by the administrator or insurer in excess of the 6amounts paid for health claims and the basis and terms for the fees and retainage.AB714,5,1075. Any out-of-network fee or negotiated discount, aligned incentive program 8fee, pay-for-performance payment or recovery, cost-containment program fee, 9overpayment recovery program fee, subrogation fee, or other special program fee or 10discount related to the contract.AB714,5,13116. Any direct or indirect compensation paid to brokers, consultants, agents, 12agencies, or any other party in relation to the plan and the basis and terms for the 13compensation.AB714,5,15147. The itemized billing statements and medical records associated with a 15specific claim if requested.AB714,5,17168. Any other claims data requested by the plan sponsor or the plan sponsor’s 17designee.AB714,5,2018(3) Duties of pharmacy benefit manager. A contract under sub. (1) 19between a plan sponsor and pharmacy benefit manager shall require the pharmacy 20benefit manager to do all of the following:AB714,6,221(a) Provide the plan sponsor or plan sponsor’s designee, within 7 business 22days of receipt of a written request and in a form and manner that is usable to the 23plan sponsor or designee, data regarding the amounts paid, directly or indirectly, 1for prescription drugs and pharmacy services by the pharmacy benefit manager to 2a pharmacy or pharmacist under the contract.AB714,6,63(b) Provide the plan sponsor or plan sponsor’s designee, within 7 business 4days of receipt of a written request and in a form and manner that is useable to the 5plan sponsor or plan sponsor’s designee, all of the following for the period specified 6by the plan sponsor or plan sponsor’s designee under sub. (4):AB714,6,1071. The prescription drug rebate amounts, identified by drug and therapeutic 8category, that are provided by a pharmaceutical manufacturer and generated by 9claims processed through the plan maintained by the plan sponsor. This 10subdivision applies to product-specific rebates and to general rebates.AB714,6,13112. The prescription drug claims, including electronic claims transactions, 12related to the contract that are received by the pharmacy benefit manager on any 13standardized claim form approved by the federal government.AB714,6,16143. The prescription drug claims payments, electronic funds transfers, and 15remittance advice notices related to the contract. The pharmacy benefit manager 16shall provide the information under this subdivision as electronic files.AB714,6,22174. The revenue and fees derived by the pharmacy benefit manager from the 18contract, including all direct and indirect remuneration from pharmaceutical 19manufacturers. If requested by the plan sponsor, the pharmacy benefit manger 20shall also specify all amounts retained by the pharmacy benefit manager in excess 21of the amounts paid out in pharmacy claims and the basis and terms for the 22revenue, fees, and retainage.AB714,7,2235. Any direct or indirect compensation paid to brokers, consultants, agents, 1agencies, or any other party in relation to the pharmacy benefit arrangement and 2the basis and terms for the compensation.AB714,7,83(4) Period covered by request. When making a request for information 4under sub. (2) (b) or (3) (b), a plan sponsor or plan sponsor’s designee shall specify 5the period of months for which the requested information is to be provided by the 6administrator, insurer, or pharmacy benefit manager. A contract under sub. (1) 7shall provide a plan sponsor or plan sponsor’s designee with the right to receive the 8information under sub. (2) (b) or (3) (b) for each of the following periods:AB714,7,1191. The 6-month period beginning on the first day of the plan year and, if 10requested by the plan sponsor or plan sponsor’s designee, the 18-month period 11ending on the day before the first day of the plan year. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab714 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab714 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB714 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB714 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB714: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting